Florida, session 2026, HB4043.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. The Citrus County Hospital Board shall wind
down its affairs, including, but not limited to, adopting a
dissolution plan that includes satisfying all of its obligations
and indebtedness and making provisions for the use of any
remaining assets of the district, including, but not limited to,
distributions to the irrevocable community trust or foundation
created pursuant to chapter 2014-254, Laws of Florida. Such plan
shall be adopted by September 30, 2026.
Section 2. Effective October 1, 2026, chapters 2011-256
and 2014-254, Laws of Florida, are repealed.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4043 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4043 2026 Legislature
Section 3. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the
Citrus County Hospital Board is dissolved effective October 1,
2026.
Section 4. Notwithstanding the repeal of chapter 2014-254,
Laws of Florida, by this act, an irrevocable community trust or
foundation established pursuant to chapter 2014-254, Laws of
Florida, may continue to operate as otherwise provided by
general law.
Section 5. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
effective October 1, 2026, all assets and liabilities of the
Citrus County Hospital Board are transferred to the Board of
County Commissioners of Citrus County. All assets received by
the board of county commissioners pursuant to this section shall
first be used to satisfy all liabilities of the former district
received pursuant to this section. All assets remaining after
the satisfaction of former district liabilities shall be used by
the board of county commissioners in accordance with the
dissolution plan adopted by the Citrus County Hospital Board
before October 1, 2026, provided such plan is consistent with
chapters 2011-256 and 2014-254, Laws of Florida.
Section 6. Except as otherwise provided in this act, this
act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4043 -00-er